Washington statutes.
RCW 39.36.060

Chapter not applicable to loan agreements under chapter 39.69 RCW.

This chapter does not apply to a loan made pursuant to a loan agreement under chapter 39.69 RCW, and any computation of indebtedness under this chapter shall exclude the amount of any loan under such a loan agreement.

[ 1987 c 19 s 5.]